Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 4 Parks and Recreation Areas
Subchapter 4

— Arkansas Trails System Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§22-4-401 —22-4-407 may not apply to §22-4-408 which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-4-401. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Trails System Act”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 132, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-603.1.

22-4-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Right-of-way” means the strip of land over which a trail is constructed whether acquired by easement or fee simple title; and

(2)

“Trail” means any road, pathway, route, or other identifiable linear facility designated, constructed, and maintained to provide specific recreational experiences to the public. Trails may be established for hiking, biking, boating, canoeing, motorcycling, horse riding, use by individuals with disabilities, and other trail-oriented uses.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 132, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-603.2; Acts 1997, No. 208, § 24.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 208, § 1, as reenacted by Acts 2017, No. 255, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent and purpose.
The General Assembly hereby acknowledges that many of the laws relating to individuals with disabilities are antiquated, functionally outmoded, derogatory, and ambiguous or are inconsistent with more recently enacted provisions of the law.
Consequently, it is the intent of the General Assembly and the purpose of this act to clarify the relevant chapters of Titles 1, 6, 9, 13, 14, 16, 17, 20, 22, 23, and 27 of the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated.”

22-4-403. Administration of Arkansas Trails System.

A statewide trails system to be called the “Arkansas Trails System” is authorized to be administered by the State Parks Division. The administration shall include:

(1)

Coordination of trail development between state, federal, county, municipal, and private entities;

(2)

Development of a wide variety of types of trails to provide maximum trail opportunities for the citizens of Arkansas;

(3)

Establishment of an interconnected trails system by developing new trails or by connecting existing trails or recreation areas;

(4)

Encouraging the development of trails in or near population centers;

(5)

Providing technical assistance for trail development and maintenance; and

(6)

Providing information about Arkansas trails.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 132, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-603.3; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5696.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following “State Parks Division” in the introductory language.

22-4-404. Arkansas Trails Council — Creation — Powers and duties.

(a)

An advisory body to the State Parks Division to be known as the “Arkansas Trails Council”, is created for the purpose of informing the division, other trail-providing agencies, and the public at large of public need, use, and ongoing and planned trail development and to provide a public forum for discussion of trail-related issues.

(b)

The council is a voluntary organization open to representatives of all state and federal agencies with an interest in or potential for trail development, to all local governments with interests in trails, to public or to private utility companies the rights-of-way of which hold trail potential, to private landowners, and to trail users.

(c)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism's representative on the council shall serve as the council's executive secretary.

(d)

The council may make suggestions to the division concerning methods to meet trail needs within the state and shall assist the division in coordinating trail development within the state.

(e)(1)

The council shall review nominations to the Arkansas Trails System and make recommendations to the division regarding the acceptance or rejection of each application based on criteria outlined in §22-4-405.

(2)

The Director of the State Parks Division may add a qualifying trail to the Arkansas Trails System after a review of recommendations made by the council.

(f)

The council shall periodically review the components of the Arkansas Trails System and submit information concerning those trails of superior quality to the National Park Service for consideration as components in the National Trails System.

(g)

The council shall assist in updating the Arkansas Trails Plan, a part of the Statewide Comprehensive Outdoor Recreation Plan.

(h)

The council shall periodically review member trails of the Arkansas Trails System for compliance with §22-4-405 and shall report its findings to the division in order to maintain high quality within the Arkansas Trails System.

(i)

Trails accepted into the Arkansas Trails System which do not fulfill the requirements established in this subchapter or prescribed by the division and the council may be removed from the Arkansas Trails System by the division after consultation with the council and after appropriate opportunity has been given for correction of the inadequacies.

(j)

The council shall not have the power of eminent domain.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 132, §§ 4, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-603.4, 9-603.7; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5697, 5698.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following the first occurrence of “State Parks Division” and substituted the second occurrence of “State Parks Division” for “division”; and substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism's” for “Department of Parks and Tourism's” in (c).

22-4-405. Criteria for acceptance into Arkansas Trails System.

Trails accepted into the Arkansas Trails System shall meet criteria as established by the Arkansas Trails Council and the State Parks Division, which shall include:

(1)

A guaranteed right-of-way for public use for a minimum period of five (5) years;

(2)

Trail operation and maintenance for a minimum period of five (5) years by an acceptable responsible organization;

(3)

Adherence to state trails standards and guidelines for the trail type designated;

(4)

Readiness of the trail for public use;

(5)

Proper marking and signing; and

(6)

Conformity of the trail with goals established in the Statewide Comprehensive Outdoor Recreation Plan or the Arkansas Trails Plan.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 132, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-603.6; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5699.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following “State Parks Division” in the introductory language.

22-4-406. Classifications of trails.

Trails in the Arkansas Trails System shall be classified according to their designated use and shall include, but not be limited to, the following classifications:

(1)

Interpretive trail — a route having natural, cultural, or historical points of interest identified to the public through the use of markers, plaques, brochures, or other readily recognizable means;

(2)

Hiking trail — a route designated, designed, and maintained for foot travel;

(3)

Bicycle trail — a route designated, designed, and maintained primarily for bicycle travel;

(4)

Motorcycle trail — a route designated, designed, and maintained primarily for trail activity by motorcycle;

(5)

Boat trail — a separate route or lane designated and maintained for trail activity by boat;

(6)

Canoe trail — a route designated and maintained for canoeing experiences;

(7)

Automobile trail — a properly marked roadway designated and maintained for recreational automobile travel;

(8)

Equestrian trail — a route designated, designed, and maintained for trail activity for horse riding;

(9)

Handicap trail — a route designated for trail activity by special groups as well as the general public; and

(10)

Recreational trail — a route designed to meet specific recreational and physical fitness needs.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 132, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-603.5.

22-4-407. Public access to private lands.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to give the public any greater right or privilege of access to private lands than that permitted by easement granted by the landowner.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 132, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-603.8.

22-4-408. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning legislative intent and purpose, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 255, §
1. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 208, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— Property Dedicated for Public Parks

Effective Dates.

Acts 1959, No. 224, § 6: Mar. 25, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that there is a dire need for providing a method of disposing of or leasing certain publicly owned recreational facilities in the state, and the enactment of this bill will provide such method. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 25, § 2: Feb. 2, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that there is a dire need for providing a method of disposing of or leasing certain publicly owned recreational facilities in the state, and the enactment of this bill will provide such method. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

22-4-501. Disposition of property authorized.

(a)(1)

The state or any municipal corporation, county, or other political subdivision thereof shall have the authority to sell, lease, grant, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any property, or interest therein, comprising parks, playgrounds, golf courses, swimming pools, or other property which has been dedicated to a public use for recreational or park purposes by a private citizen, corporation, or association. The property, or interest therein, may have been thereafter acquired by the state, county, city, or other political subdivision thereof without regard to whether the public use has been previously abandoned or whether the property has become unsuitable or inadequate for the purpose for which originally dedicated.

(2)

Any disposition shall be on such terms and conditions as may be deemed desirable or necessary.

(b)(1)

Any municipality in this state shall have the authority to lease to any individual, firm, or corporation municipal property comprising parks, playgrounds, golf courses, swimming pools, or other property which have been dedicated to a public use for recreational or park purposes on such terms and conditions as may be desirable or necessary.

(2)

Any municipality is also authorized to lease municipally owned lands and facilities to a community college board to be used for educational purposes.

(3)

Any lease under this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years.

(4)

Those persons or entities holding leases on municipal park and recreational facilities on July 5, 1977, shall have the first option to renew their leases.

(c)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any lease under this subchapter shall be for a period not to exceed twenty (20) years.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 224, § 1; 1961, No. 25, § 1; 1965, No. 102, § 1; 1977, No. 795, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-701, 19-3646.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1977, No. 795, § 1, is also codified as §14-269-103(b).

22-4-502. Officers authorized to execute disposition.

Any sale, lease, grant, or other disposition authorized by §22-4-501 shall be in the discretion of, and executed by:

(1)

The Governor, as to state property;

(2)

The county judge, as to county property;

(3)

The mayor and council, city commissioners, or other governing authority, as to property of a municipal corporation.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 224, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-702.

22-4-503. Procedure for advertising disposition — Bids.

(a)

Any sale, lease, grant, exchange, or other disposition of any property under the provisions of this subchapter shall be made only after advertising the disposition in a newspaper in which legal advertisements are published for the county in which the land or other facilities to be disposed of lie, one (1) time a week for four (4) weeks.

(b)

In the event the property to be sold lies in more than one (1) county, the advertisement shall be run one (1) time a week for four (4) weeks in the newspaper in which legal advertisements are published for each county.

(c)

All state property required to be advertised under this subchapter shall also be advertised in two (2) additional newspapers of general circulation in this state.

(d)

The advertisements shall describe the property, state the manner of disposition to be made, specify the time and place of the disposition, and state any other requirements stipulated by the disposing instrumentality of government, including an award to the highest responsible bidder, subject to the provisions of subsection (f) of this section.

(e)

All sales and other dispositions under the provisions of this subchapter shall be made under the terms of the advertisement for cash sale, rental, or lease consideration.

(f)

The selling or disposing authority shall have the right to reject all bids in the event the high bid shall prove unsatisfactory for any reason. The property shall then be readvertised and disposed of pursuant to this section.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 224, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-703.

22-4-504. Obligation of contract provision or indebtedness not impaired.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as impairing the obligation of any contract provision, bond issue, or other indebtedness thereon, whether by way of reversionary clause or otherwise.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 224, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-704.

Subchapter 6

— Crowley's Ridge Trail Commission

22-4-601, 22-4-602. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 783, § 1, provided:

“The following are hereby abolished: (1) The Advisory Committee on Accountability; (2) The Crowley's Ridge Trail Commission; (3) The advisory council to the Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission of the Department of Arkansas Heritage; (4) The Advisory Board for Director of the Arkansas High Technology Training Center; (5) The Low-Level Radioactive Waste Advisory Group; (6) The Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission; (7) The Quality Management Board; and (8) The Arkansas Task Force on Timber Land Assessment;”.

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Crowley's Ridge Trail Commission, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 783, § 2. The section was derived from the following sources:

22-4-601. Acts 1997, No. 564, § 1.

22-4-602. Acts 1997, No. 564, § 2.

Subchapter 7

— Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route Act

22-4-701. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route Act”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1009, §
1.

22-4-702. Creation of bike route.

The route along U.S. Highway 62 from the border between Oklahoma and Arkansas to the Trail of Tears Park and Historic Site located on the campus of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville at the northwest corner of the intersection of Stadium Drive and Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard, thirty-six degrees three seconds north (36° 00' 03" N) and ninety-four degrees ten seconds west (94° 00' 10" W), is designated the “Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1009, §
1.

22-4-703. Requirements — Definitions — Funding.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Sign” means a permanent marker placed along the Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route identifying the route as the “Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route”; and

(2)

“Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route” means the route along U.S. Highway 62 from the border between Oklahoma and Arkansas to the Trail of Tears Park and Historic Site located on the campus of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville at the northwest corner of the intersection of Stadium Drive and Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard, thirty-six degrees three seconds north (36° 00' 03" N) and ninety-four degrees ten seconds west (94° 00' 10" W).

(b)

The Arkansas Department of Transportation may:

(1)

Erect appropriate signs along the Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route; and

(2)

Construct a bicycle lane along the Trail of Tears Historic Bike Route that conforms to federal standards regarding the bicycle lane's:

(A)

Width;

(B)

Design; and

(C)

Pavement markings.

(c)

The department may apply for, receive, and use gifts, grants, and donations from private and public sources to:

(1)

Acquire and install the signs and construct the bicycle lane required under subsection (b) of this section; and

(2)

Maintain, replace, or reconstruct the signs and the bicycle lane required under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1009, §
1.